Alaska statutes. Title 5. Amusements and Sports.
Chapter 10. Boxing and Wrestling.

Administrative Code. —

For athletic commission, see 12 AAC 06.

Sec. 05.10.010.
Licenses for boxing and wrestling matches.

The athletic commission may issue, and for cause revoke, a license to conduct boxing contests, sparring or wrestling matches, or exhibitions as provided in this chapter under terms and conditions and at times and places as the commission may determine. The holder of a license may conduct boxing contests, sparring and wrestling matches, and exhibitions under terms and conditions and at times and places as the commission may determine.
If the commission refuses to grant a license to an applicant, or cancels a license, the applicant, or the holder of the cancelled license may, upon application, have a hearing under the provisions of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 1 ch 157 SLA 1960)

Cross references. —

For licensing provisions, see AS 08.01.

Administrative Code. —

For professional boxing contest requirements, see 12 AAC 6, art. 2.

For wrestling matches and exhibitions, see 12 AAC 6, art. 3.

For promoters and contracts, see 12 AAC 6, art. 5.

For club boxing contest requirements, see 12 AAC 6, art. 6.

Collateral references. —

27A Am. Jur. 2d, Entertainment and Sports Law, §§ 9-14, 24, 38, 39.

53 C.J.S. Licenses, §§ 8-12, 36-40

30A C.J.S., Entertainment and Amusement

Sports, §§ 9, 10, 16.

Liability for injury for one attending wrestling or boxing match or exhibition. 14 ALR3d 993.

Validity of state or local regulation dealing with resale of tickets to theatrical or sporting events. 81 ALR3d 655.

Sec. 05.10.020.
Power of commission.

The commission shall direct, supervise, and control all boxing contests, or sparring and wrestling matches or exhibitions conducted inside the state, and a boxing contest, sparring or wrestling match or exhibition may not be held inside the state except in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 157 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For professional boxing contest requirements, see 12 AAC 6, art. 2.

For wrestling matches and exhibitions, see 12 AAC 6, art. 3.

For facilities, equipment and supplies, see 12 AAC 6, art. 4.

For promoters and contracts, see 12 AAC 6, art. 5.

For club boxing contest requirements, see 12 AAC 6, art. 6.

Sec. 05.10.030.
License for contest, match, or exhibition where admission fee is charged; exemption.

The commission may issue, and for cause revoke, a license to conduct, hold, or give boxing, sparring and wrestling contests, matches, and exhibitions where an admission fee is charged by a club, corporation, organization, association, or fraternal society.
However, boxing contests, sparring or wrestling matches or exhibitions conducted by an elementary school, high school, college, or university, whether public or private, or by the official student association thereof, whether on or off the school, college, or university grounds, where all the participating contestants are bona fide students enrolled in an elementary school, high school, college, or university, inside the state, are not subject to this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 157 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For wrestling matches and exhibitions, see 12 AAC 6, art. 3.

Sec. 05.10.040.
Examination of participants in unlicensed contests.

Every contestant in a boxing contest, sparring or wrestling match not conducted under this chapter shall be examined within eight hours before the contest by a practicing physician.
The examining physician may disqualify any contestant the physician considers physically unfit to participate.

History.

(§ 2 ch 157 SLA 1960)

Sec. 05.10.050.
Regulations applicable to educational institutions.

The scholastic organizations exempted from the provisions of this chapter shall comply with the regulations of the commission applicable to boxing contests, sparring or wrestling matches, or exhibitions conducted by it.

History.

(§ 2 ch 157 SLA 1960)

Sec. 05.10.060.
License required.

Except as provided in this chapter, a boxing contest, sparring or wrestling match or exhibition may not be conducted inside the state except under a license issued in accordance with this chapter and the regulations of the commission.

History.

(§ 2 ch 157 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For wrestling matches and exhibitions, see 12 AAC 6, art. 3.

Sec. 05.10.070.
Application for license.

A club, corporation, organization, association, or fraternal society affected by this chapter may apply to the commission for a license.
An application must be in writing and upon a form prescribed by the commission and must be verified in the manner the commission requires and accompanied by an annual license fee of $100.

History.

(§ 3 ch 157 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For wrestling matches and exhibitions, see 12 AAC 6, art. 3.

Sec. 05.10.080.
Duration of license.

The licenses provided for in AS

05.10.070

and

05.10.120

shall be issued for a six-month or 12-month period and shall expire on June 30 and December 31 of each year.

History.

(§ 4 ch 157 SLA 1960)

Sec. 05.10.090.
Licensee bond.

A licensee shall file a good and sufficient bond in the sum of $1,000 with the commission in cities of fewer than 10,000 inhabitants and a good and sufficient bond in the sum of $2,500 in cities of more than 10,000 inhabitants.
The bond must be conditioned for the faithful performance by the licensee of the provisions of this chapter, the payment of the taxes as provided for in this chapter, and the obeying of all regulations of the commission.
The bond is subject to the approval of the attorney general.

History.

(§ 5 ch 157 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For promoters and contracts, see 12 AAC 6, art. 5.

Sec. 05.10.100.
Statement and report of contest.

A licensee shall, within three days before the holding of a boxing contest, sparring or wrestling match, or exhibition, file with the commission a statement setting forth the name of each contestant, the contestant’s manager, and other information the commission requires.
One week after the completion of the contest, the licensee shall file with the Department of Revenue and the commission a written verified report, showing the number of tickets sold for the contest, the price charged for them and the gross proceeds from the sale, and other information the commission requires.

History.

(§ 6 ch 157 SLA 1960)

Sec. 05.10.110.
Inspectors.

The commission may appoint official inspectors.
In the absence of a member of the commission, at least one inspector shall be present at any boxing contest, sparring or wrestling match, or exhibition held under this chapter. An inspector shall carry a card signed by the chairman of the commission evidencing the inspector’s authority. The inspector shall see that all regulations of the commission and the provisions of this chapter are strictly complied with and shall be present at the accounting of the gross receipts of the contest.
An inspector may receive from the licensee the statement of receipts provided for in this chapter and shall immediately transmit the statement to the commission and to the Department of Revenue.
An inspector is entitled to a fee not exceeding $7.50 for each contest officially attended.

History.

(§ 7 ch 157 SLA 1960)

Sec. 05.10.120.
Annual licenses to participants; fees; exemptions; designation of referee.

The commission may grant annual licenses upon application in compliance with the regulations adopted by the commission and the payment of the fees prescribed for managers, referees, examining physicians, boxers, wrestlers, seconds, and trainers.

The following is the schedule of annual fees:

examining physicians, $10;

managers, $50;

referees, $10;

seconds, $10;

trainers, $10;

boxers, $10;

wrestlers, $10.

This section does not apply to contestants or participants in strictly amateur contests or fraternal organizations or veterans’ organizations chartered by congress or a federal department or a bona fide athletic club holding and promoting athletic contests or smokers where all funds are used primarily for the benefit of their members.

The annual license may be revoked by the commission for cause under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

The commission shall designate the referee for the contest from among licensed referees.

A person may not participate or serve in any of the above capacities unless licensed as provided in this chapter.

History.

(§ 8 ch 157 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For wrestling matches and exhibitions, see 12 AAC 6, art. 3.

For promoters and contracts, see 12 AAC 6, art. 5.

Sec. 05.10.130.
Participation in purse or conducting sham contest.

A person or a member of any group of persons or corporation promoting wrestling or boxing exhibitions or contests who participates directly or indirectly in the purse or fee of a manager of a boxer or wrestler or a boxer or a wrestler, and a licensee who conducts or participates in any sham or fake boxing contest or sparring match or exhibition, forfeits the license granted under this chapter and the commission shall declare the license cancelled and void and the licensee may not thereafter receive another license.

History.

(§ 9 ch 157 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For professional boxing contest requirements, see 12 AAC 6, art. 2.

Sec. 05.10.140.
Suspensions for violations.

A contestant who participates in a sham or fake boxing contest or sparring match or exhibition or who violates a regulation of the commission shall be penalized as follows:

for the first offense the contestant shall be restrained by order of the commission for a period of at least three months from participating in a contest held under the provisions of this chapter, with the suspension taking effect immediately after the occurrence of the offense;

for a second offense the contestant shall be permanently suspended from participation in a contest held under the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 10 ch 157 SLA 1960)

Sec. 05.10.150.
Failure to make reports.

Whenever a licensee fails to make a report of a contest within the time prescribed by this chapter or when the report is unsatisfactory to the commission or to the Department of Revenue, the secretary shall examine the books and records of the licensee.
The secretary may subpoena and examine under oath the licensee and any other person the secretary considers necessary to a determination of the total gross receipts from a contest and the amount of tax on the receipts.
If, upon the completion of the examination, it is determined that an additional tax is due, notice shall be served upon the licensee, and, upon failure to pay the additional tax within 20 days after service of the notice, the licensee forfeits the license and is permanently disqualified from receiving a new license.
In addition the licensee and the members thereof are jointly and severally liable to the state in the penal sum of $1,000.

History.

(§ 11 ch 157 SLA 1960)

Sec. 05.10.160.
Penalty for conducting contests or exhibitions without license.

A person, club, corporation, organization, association, or fraternal society conducting boxing, sparring, or wrestling contests or exhibitions without a license is guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 12 ch 157 SLA 1960)

Cross references. —

For classifications of misdemeanors, see AS

11.81.250

; for fines and sentences for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

, respectively.

Collateral references. —

53 C.J.S., Licenses, §§ 74-77, 82-87

30A C.J.S., Entertainment and Amusement

Sports, §§ 34-36

57-60.

Sec. 05.10.170.
General penalty.

A person violating a provision of this chapter for which no penalty is provided in this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 13 ch 157 SLA 1960)

Cross references. —

For classifications of misdemeanors, see AS

11.81.250

; for fines and sentences for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

, respectively.